District of Columbia statutes.
34-1731.06

Termination of the franchise agreement.

(a)

The Mayor shall notify the franchisee in writing of any violations of the franchise agreement and shall establish a compliance schedule for correcting the violations. If the compliance schedule is not met, the Mayor may terminate the franchise agreement after 60 days’ written notice to the franchisee of the intent to terminate the franchise agreement, setting forth the reasons for the termination.

(b)

In the event of bankruptcy of the franchisee, the Mayor shall terminate the franchise agreement and provide the franchisee written notice of this action.

(c)

In addition to the grounds for termination of the franchise agreement under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the Mayor may include in the franchise agreement any other terms and conditions that shall constitute the basis for cancellation that are in the best interests of the District.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-210, § 7, 53 DCR 9122
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of Digital Inclusion Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-467, July 25, 2006, 53 DCR 6754).